Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 13, chapter 119, Oregon Laws 2005, as amended  by section 4, chapter 507,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 14, chapter 326, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1) The Housing and Community Services Department may not issue a certification
under ORS 307.841 to 307.867 on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) A city or county may not  issue a certification under ORS 307.841 to 307.867 on or after
January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2074 (HB 2074-INTRO) Page 1